Wyoming, session 2025, HB0155.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) Every hospital, health care clinic and long-term
care facility that receives any state funds shall be
required to report to the department of workforce services
HB0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0567
the following information on a monthly basis beginning
August 1, 2025:

(i) Incidents of workplace violence against
health care providers;

(ii) The category of the person committing the
violence, including:

(A) Patient;

(B) Health care provider;

(C) Family members or acquaintances of
patients;

(D) Others, as specified by the person
making the report.

(iii) Patient-related risk factors that may have
contributed to the violence, such as mental health disorder
diagnoses or substance use;

HB0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0567
(iv) Environmental risk factors, such as
restricted patient visitation, lack of security or
excessive wait times;

(v) The types of incidents, including physical
assaults, attempted physical assaults, verbal abuse,
threats of harm or verbal discrimination based on race, sex
or gender;

(vi) The victims of the reported incidents by
job type;

(vii) The location of each incident, by physical
address and department of the hospital, clinic or long‑term
care facility.

(b) The department of workforce services shall report
the information in subsection (a) of this section, as well
as the total number of incidents reported between July 1,
2025 and July 1, 2026, to the joint labor, health and
social services interim committee not later than October 1,
2026.

HB0155

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0567
(c) As used in this section, "health care provider"
means as defined in W.S. 1-1-130(b)(i).

Section 2. The department of workforce services shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act, including the creation of a standardized form
for hospitals, health care clinics and long‑term care
facilities to utilize for reporting workplace violence.

Section 3.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0155